Washington statutes.
RCW 18.200.080

Licensure without examination.

The secretary may grant a license without an examination for those applicants who have practiced full time for five of the six years prior to *the effective date of this act and who have provided comprehensive orthotic or prosthetic, or orthotic and prosthetic, services in an established practice. This section applies only to those individuals who apply within one year of *the effective date of this act.

[ 1997 c 285 s 9.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: 1997 c 285 has two different effective dates. The effective date for sections 1 through 5 and 8 through 12 is December 1, 1998, and the effective date for the remainder of the act is July 27, 1997.